tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme > Göğüs Pedleri ve Koruyucuları: Göğüs Kalkanları; Tek Kullanımlık Emzirme Pedleri; Yeniden Kullanılabilir Emzirme Pedleri
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене > Подплънки и протектори за кърмачки: Протектори за гърди; Подплънки за еднократна употреба; Подплънки за многократна употреба
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation > Coussinets d’allaitement et téterelles: Protège-mamelons; Coussinets d’allaitement jetables; Coussinets d’allaitement réutilisables
sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning > Amningskupor och bröstvårtsskydd: Bröstvårtsskydd; Amningsskydd för engångsbruk; Återanvändbara amningsskydd
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление > Накладки на соски и лактационные вкладыши: Накладки на соски; Одноразовые лактационные вкладыши; Многоразовые лактационные вкладыши
nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating > Ammeinnlegg og skjold: Brystskjold; Éngangsammeinnlegg; Gjenbrukbare ammeinnlegg
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食 > 防溢乳墊/乳頭保護罩: 擠乳護罩; 拋棄式防溢乳墊; 可重複使用式防溢乳墊
nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding > Zoogkompressen en tepelhoedjes: Borstschilden; Wegwerpzoogkompressen; Herbruikbare zoogkompressen
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje > Blazinice in ščitniki za dojenje: Ščitniki za prsi; Podloge za dojenje za enkratno uporabo; Podloge za dojenje za ponovno uporabo
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés > Szoptatóbetétek és -pajzsok: Mellpajzsok; Eldobható szoptatóbetétek; Újrahasználható szoptatóbetétek
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas > Žindymo įdėklai ir skydeliai: Krūtų skydeliai; Vienkartiniai žindymo įdėklai; Daugkartiniai žindymo įdėklai
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning > Brystpuder og ammebrikker: Brystbeskyttere; Engangsammeindlæg; Genanvendelige ammeindlæg
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione > Protezioni per capezzoli e cuscinetti per allattamento: Coppe per il seno; Coppette assorbilatte usa e getta; Coppette assorbilatte riutilizzabili
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม > ผ้ารองและที่กั้นสำหรับให้นม: ที่ป้องกันเต้านม; ผ้ารองสำหรับให้นมแบบใช้แล้วทิ้ง; ผ้ารองสำหรับให้นมแบบใช้ซ้ำได้
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación > Protectores y almohadillas de lactancia: Protectores mamarios; Almohadillas de lactancia desechables; Almohadillas de lactancia reutilizables
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje > Jastučići i štitnici za dojilje: Štitnici za grudi; Jednokratni jastučići za dojenje; Jastučići za dojenje za višekratnu upotrebu
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn > Miếng chặn sữa: Phễu hút sữa; Miếng chặn sữa dùng một lần; Miếng chặn sữa có thể tái sử dụng
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação > Almofadas e protetores para mamilos: Peitorais; Almofadas de amamentação descartáveis; Almofadas de amamentação reutilizáveis
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养 > 防溢乳垫/罩: 吸奶器护罩; 一次性防溢乳垫; 可重用防溢乳垫
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση > Επιθέματα θηλασμού & προστατευτικά θηλών: Προστατευτικά στήθους; Επιθέματα θηλασμού μίας χρήσης; Επαναχρησιμοποιούμενα επιθέματα θηλασμού
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen > Liivinsuojat ja rintakumit: Liivinsuojat; Kertakäyttöiset liivinsuojat; Uudelleenkäytettävät liivinsuojat
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern > Stillhütchen & -einlagen: Stillhütchen; Einweg-Stilleinlagen; Wiederverwendbare Stilleinlagen
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení > Chrániče a vložky do podprsenky: Chrániče bradavek; Jednorázové vložky do podprsenky pro kojící ženy; Opakovaně použitelné vložky do podprsenky pro kojící ženy
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie > Wkładki laktacyjne i osłonki na brodawki: Osłony na brodawki; Jednorazowe wkładki laktacyjne; Wielorazowe wkładki laktacyjne
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie > Podložky na dojčenie a chrániče bradaviek: Chrániče bradaviek; Jednorazové podložky na dojčenie; Opätovne použiteľné podložky na dojčenie
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire > Tampoane și protecții pentru alăptare: Protecții pentru sâni; Tampoane de alăptare de unică folosință; Tampoane de alăptare reutilizabile
en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding > Nursing Pads & Shields: Breast Shields; Disposable Nursing Pads; Reusable Nursing Pads
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação > Almofadas e proteções para alimentação: Protetores de peito; Almofadas de amamentação descartáveis; Almofadas de amamentação reutilizáveis
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食 > 授乳パッド・乳頭保護器: ブレストシールド; 使い捨て授乳パッド; 再利用可能な授乳パッド
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품 > 수유 패드/유두 보호기: 유두 보호기; 일회용 수유 패드; 다회용 수유 패드